Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 40b, is amended to read: Subd. 40b. Micromobility device. (a) "Micromobility device" means a vehicle that: (1) is capable of: (i) being propelled solely by human power; (ii) being powered solely by an electric motor drawing current from rechargeable storage batteries, fuel cells, or other portable sources of electrical current; or (iii) both (i) and (ii); (2) when solely powered by an electric motor, is not capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed greater than deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 20new text end miles per hour on a paved level surface; and (3) has an unloaded weight of up to deleted text begin 500deleted text end new text begin 100new text end pounds. (b) Micromobility device includes a bicycle, a motorized foot scooter, and an electric personal assistive mobility device. deleted text begin Micromobility device includes a motorized bicycle that meets the requirements under paragraph (a).deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 44, is amended to read: Subd. 44. Motorcycle. new text begin (a) new text end "Motorcycle" means every motor vehicle deleted text begin havingdeleted text end new text begin that:new text end new text begin (1) hasnew text end a seat or saddle for the use of the rider deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) isnew text end designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the grounddeleted text begin , includingdeleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) is propelled by an electric or liquid fuel motor. new text end new text begin (b) Motorcycle includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) a vehicle under paragraph (a) or a bicycle that has an electric motor of at least 1,500 watts or that is capable of being propelled by an electric or liquid fuel motor at speeds in excess of 30 miles per hour on a flat surface with not more than one percent grade in any direction; new text end new text begin (2)new text end motor scootersnew text begin ;new text end and new text begin (3)new text end autocycles. new text begin (c) A vehicle is not anew text end motorcycle deleted text begin does not includedeleted text end new text begin if it meets the requirements of:new text end (1)new text begin anew text end motorized deleted text begin bicyclesdeleted text end new text begin bicyclenew text end as defined in subdivision 45deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (2)new text begin annew text end electric-assisted deleted text begin bicyclesdeleted text end new text begin bicyclenew text end as defined in subdivision 27deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (3)new text begin a motorized foot scooter;new text end new text begin (4)new text end a tractordeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5) anew text end roadable aircraft. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 45, is amended to read: Subd. 45. Motorized bicycle. new text begin (a) new text end "Motorized bicycle" means a bicycle new text begin or other vehicle that has a seat for the use of the rider and is designed to travel on not more than two wheels in contact with the ground, new text end that isnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end propelled by an electricnew text begin motor of more than 750 watts but less than 1,500 wattsnew text end or a liquid fuel motor of a piston displacement capacity of 50 cubic centimeters or less, and a maximum of two brake horsepowerdeleted text begin , which isdeleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2)new text end capable of a maximum speed of not more than 30 miles per hour on a flat surface with not more than one percent grade in any direction when the motor is engaged. new text begin (b)new text end Motorized bicycle does not include an electric-assisted bicycle as defined in subdivision 27. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application to persons, places, and vehicles. new text begin (a) new text end The provisions of this chapter relating to the operation of vehicles refer exclusively to the operation of vehicles upon highways, and upon highways, streets, private roads, and roadways situated on property owned, leased, or occupied by the regents of the University of Minnesota, or the University of Minnesota, except: (1) where a different place is specifically referred to in a given section; (2) the provisions of sections 169.09 to 169.13 apply to any person who drives, operates, or is in physical control of a motor vehicle within this state or upon the ice of any boundary water of this state, and to any person who drives, operates, or is in physical control of a snowmobile on a snowmobile trail within this state. new text begin (b) A person must not operate a vehicle upon the highways of Minnesota unless, at the time of operation, the vehicle satisfies the specifications of a type of vehicle that is defined in section 169.011. For the purposes of this paragraph, it is not sufficient for the vehicle to only meet the definition of vehicle, as that term is defined in section 169.011, subdivision 92. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.09, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Officer to report accident to commissioner. (a) A peace officer who investigates in the regular course of duty an accident that is required to be reported under this section must submit an electronic or written report of the accident to the commissioner of public safety within ten days after the date of the accident. Within two business days after identification of a fatality that resulted from an accident, the reporting agency must notify the commissioner of the basic circumstances of the accident. A report or notification under this subdivision must be in the format as prescribed in subdivision 9. (b) Accidents on streets, highways, roadways, sidewalks, shoulders, shared use paths, or any other portion of a public right-of-way must be reported under the requirements of this section if the accident results in: (1) a fatality; (2) bodily injury to a person who, because of the injury, immediately receives medical treatment away from or at the scene of the accident; (3) one or more of the motor vehicles incurring disabling damage that requires a vehicle to be transported away from the scene of the accident by tow truck or other vehicle; or (4) damage to fixtures, infrastructure, or any other property alongside or on a highway. (c) An accident involving a school bus, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 71, must be reported under the requirements of this section and section 169.4511. (d) An accident involving a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in section 169.781, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), must be reported under the requirements of this section and section 169.783. (e) Accidents occurring on public lands or trail systems that result in the circumstances specified in paragraph (b) must be reported under the requirements of this section. new text begin (f) An accident involving an electric-assisted or a motorized bicycle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivisions 27 and 45, that results in the circumstances specified in paragraph (b) must be reported under the requirements of this section. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.222, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Traffic laws apply. (a) Every person operating a bicycle has all of the rights and duties applicable to the driver of any other vehicle by this chapter, except in respect to those provisions in this chapter relating expressly to bicycles and in respect to those provisions of this chapter which by their nature cannot reasonably be applied to bicycles. This deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin paragraphnew text end applies to a bicycle operating on the new text begin roadway or the new text end shoulder of a roadway. (b) A person lawfully operating a bicycle (1) on a sidewalk, or (2) across a roadway or shoulder while using a crosswalk has all the rights and duties applicable to a pedestrian under the same circumstances. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.222, subdivision 6a, is amended to read: Subd. 6a. Electric-assisted bicycle; riding rules. (a) A person may operate an electric-assisted bicycle in the same manner as provided for operation of other bicycles, including but not limited to operation on the shoulder of a roadway, a bicycle lane, and a bicycle route, and operation without the motor engaged on a bikeway or bicycle trail. (b) A person may operate a class 1 or class 2 electric-assisted bicycle with the motor engaged on a bicycle path, bicycle trail, or shared use path unless prohibited under section 85.015, subdivision 1d; 85.018, subdivision 2, paragraph (d); or 160.263, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), as applicable. (c) A person may operate a class 3 electric-assisted bicycle or multiple mode electric-assisted bicycle with the motor engaged on a bicycle path, bicycle trail, or shared use path unless the local authority or state agency having jurisdiction over the bicycle path or trail prohibits the operation. (d) The local authority or state agency having jurisdiction over a trail or over a bike park that is designated as nonmotorized and that has a natural surface tread made by clearing and grading the native soil with no added surfacing materials may regulate the operation of an electric-assisted bicycle. (e) A person under the age of 15 must not operate an electric-assisted bicycle. new text begin (f) A person under the age of 18 must wear protective headgear that meets or exceeds the standards under Code of Federal Regulations, title 16, part 1203, or successor requirements while operating an electric-assisted bicycle. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.222, subdivision 6b, is amended to read: Subd. 6b. Electric-assisted bicycle; equipment. (a) The manufacturer or distributor of an electric-assisted bicycle must apply a label to the bicycle that is permanently affixed in a prominent location. The label must contain the class number, top assisted speed, and motor wattage of the electric-assisted bicycle, and must be printed in a legible font with at least 9-point type. A multiple mode electric-assisted bicycle must have labeling that identifies the highest class or each of the electric-assisted bicycle classes in which it is capable of operating. (b) A person must not modify an electric-assisted bicycle to change the motor-powered speed capability or motor engagement so that the bicycle no longer meets the requirements for the applicable class, unless: (1) the person replaces the label required in paragraph (a) with revised information; or (2) for a vehicle that no longer meets the requirements for any electric-assisted bicycle class, the person removes the labeling as an electric-assisted bicyclenew text begin and replaces it with labeling that conforms with the requirements of section 169.223, subdivision 6new text end . (c) An electric-assisted bicycle must operate in a manner so that the electric motor is disengaged or ceases to function: (1) when the brakes are applied; or (2) except for a class 2 electric-assisted bicycle or a multiple mode electric-assisted bicycle operating in class 2 mode, when the rider stops pedaling. (d) A class 3 electric-assisted bicycle or multiple mode electric-assisted bicycle must be equipped with a speedometer that displays the speed at which the bicycle is traveling in miles per hour. (e) A multiple mode electric-assisted bicycle equipped with a throttle must not be capable of exceeding 20 miles per hour on motorized propulsion alone in any mode when the throttle is engaged. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.223, is amended to read: 169.223 MOTORIZED BICYCLE. Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Safety equipment; parkingdeleted text end new text begin Rules for motorcycles apply; exceptionsnew text end . Section 169.974 relating to motorcycles is applicable to motorized bicycles, except as otherwise provided in this section and except that: (1) protective headgear includes headgear that meets new text begin or exceedsnew text end the standards under Code of Federal Regulations, title 16, part 1203, or successor requirementsnew text begin and is only required for operators under 18 years of agenew text end ;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (2) a motorized bicycle equipped with a headlight and taillight meeting the requirements of lighting for motorcycles may be operated during nighttime hours; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) protective headgear is not required for operators 18 years of age or older; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end the provisions of section 169.222, subdivision 9, governing the parking of bicycles apply to motorized bicycles. Subd. 2. License or permit. (a) A motorized bicycle may be operated under either a driver's license or a motorized bicycle permit issued under section 171.02, subdivision 3. (b) A person under the age of 16 operating a motorized bicycle under a motorized bicycle permit is subject to the restrictions imposed by section 169.974, subdivision 2, on operation of a motorcycle under a two-wheel instruction permit, except thatdeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end a parent or guardian of an operator under the age of 16 may also ride on the motorized bicycle as a passenger or operator if the motorized bicycle is equipped with a seat and footrests for a second passengerdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (2) a motorized bicycle equipped with a headlight and taillight meeting the requirements of lighting for motorcycles may be operated during nighttime hours; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) protective headgear includes headgear described in subdivision 1; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4) protective headgear is required only until the operator reaches the age of 18 years. deleted text end Subd. 3. Sidewalknew text begin , path,new text end and passenger prohibitions. deleted text begin No person shalldeleted text end new text begin (a) A person must notnew text end operate a motorized bicycle upon a sidewalk at any time, except when such operation is necessary for the most direct access to a roadway from a driveway, alley or building. deleted text begin No person shalldeleted text end new text begin (b) A person must not operate a motorized bicycle on a bicycle path or shared use path at any time. new text end new text begin (c) A person must not new text end operate a motorized bicycle that is carrying any person other than the operator, except as allowed under subdivision 2. Subd. 4. Headlight requirement. The provisions of section 169.974, subdivision 5, paragraph deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (l)new text end , apply to motorized bicycles deleted text begin that are equipped with headlights. A new motorized bicycle sold or offered for sale in Minnesota must be equipped with a headlightdeleted text end . Subd. 5. Other operation requirements and prohibitions. (a) A person operating a motorized bicycle on a roadway shall ride as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway except in one of the following situations: (1) when overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction; (2) when preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into a private road or driveway; or (3) when reasonably necessary to avoid conditions, including fixed or moving objects, vehicles, pedestrians, animals, surface hazards, or narrow width lanes, that make it unsafe to continue along the right-hand curb or edge. (b) Persons operating motorized bicycles on a roadway may not ride more than two abreast and may not impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic. On a laned roadway, a person operating a motorized bicycle shall ride within a single lane. (c) deleted text begin This section does not permit the operation ofdeleted text end A motorized bicycle new text begin must not be operated new text end on a bicycle path or bicycle lane that is reserved for the exclusive use of nonmotorized traffic. new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Labeling. new text end new text begin The manufacturer or distributor of a motorized bicycle must apply a label to the motorized bicycle that is permanently affixed in a prominent location. The label must contain the top assisted speed and the motor wattage of the motorized bicycle, and must be printed in a legible font with at least 9-point type. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Electrical safety standards. new text end new text begin No person may sell a motorized bicycle powered by an electric motor unless the motorized bicycle: new text end new text begin (1) has been certified by an independent third party ISO-17065 certified laboratory for compliance with ANSI/CAN/UL Standard 2272 and bears the certification mark of the laboratory; or new text end new text begin (2) has been certified by the vehicle manufacturer for compliance with SAE International standard J2929 or a similar applicable electrical safety standard approved by the commissioner of public safety. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [169.2231] MOTORIZED BICYCLE SAFETY COORDINATOR. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Motorized bicycle safety coordinator. new text end new text begin There is established a position of motorized bicycle safety coordinator in the Department of Public Safety, within the Office of Traffic Safety. The commissioner of public safety shall designate the coordinator. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The duties of the coordinator include: new text end new text begin (1) educating state and local law enforcement and the public about the laws governing electric-assisted bicycles, motorized bicycles, motorized foot scooters, other micromobility devices, and motorcycles; new text end new text begin (2) assisting state and local law enforcement in identifying and categorizing the vehicles described in clause (1); new text end new text begin (3) creating and maintaining a database of manufacturers of the vehicles in clause (1) that classifies the manufacturers' products under state law; new text end new text begin (4) providing timely support to law enforcement to assist in identifying vehicles and applicable state law and rules; and new text end new text begin (5) providing technical assistance and advice related to the investigation and enforcement of sections 169.222, 169.223, and 325F.661. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Requirements. new text end new text begin The motorized bicycle safety coordinator must consult with the active transportation advisory committee regarding educational materials, vehicle classifications, and any policy recommendations provided under subdivision 2. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.974, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Electrical safety standards. new text end new text begin No person may sell a motorcycle powered by an electric motor unless the motorcycle has been certified by the vehicle manufacturer for compliance with: new text end new text begin (1) the latest revision of SAE International standard J2929; or new text end new text begin (2) a similar applicable standard from SAE International, International Organization for Standardization (ISO), United Nations Economic Commission for Europe (UNECE), or International Electrotechnical Commission (IEC), or another electrical safety standard. new text end new text begin A standard under clause (2) must be approved by the commissioner of public safety. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin PUBLIC EDUCATION CAMPAIGN; ELECTRIC-ASSISTED AND MOTORIZED BICYCLE SAFETY.new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must implement a statewide information campaign to educate the public about the safe and lawful operation of electric-assisted and motorized bicycles. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY.new text end new text begin (a) The appropriations in this section are from the active transportation account in the special revenue fund to the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin (b) $121,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated for the costs of the motorized bicycle safety coordinator under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.2231. The base for this appropriation is $119,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. new text end new text begin (c) $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated for the public education campaign on electric-assisted and motorized bicycle safety under section 12. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (d) $26,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated for updates to the statewide crash reporting system to allow reporting of crashes involving electric-assisted or motorized bicycles. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (e) $2,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated for updates to the driver's manual related to requiring helmets for electric-assisted bicycle riders under age 18. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end